Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-412.03
County board; agreements for criminal and civil trials.

The county board of any county described in section 25-412.01 or 25-412.02 may enter into an agreement under the Interlocal Cooperation Act with the county board of another county or other counties for the trial of all contested criminal and civil cases, whether or not a jury trial has been requested. Any case subject to any such agreement shall be subject to the applicable provisions of law relating to changes of venue except as provided in section 25-412.04.

Laws 1975, LB 97, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-903.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.